Hawaii, session 2025, GM1274.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. Section 453-4.5, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
"§453-4.5 Foreign medical graduates; alternative
qualifications. Notwithstanding section 453-4(b)(2)(B), a
graduate of a foreign medical school [who ha-s-passed] may be
licensed by the Hawaii medical board under section 453-4 (c) if
the graduate:
(1) Passed the Federation Licensing Examination (FLEX) or
the United States Medical Licensing Examination
(USMLE), or a combination of these examinations as
approved by the board, with scores deemed satisfactory
to the board, passed the qualifying examination of the
Educational Commission for Foreign Medical Graduates
[prior -to 1984] , and has at least three years of
medical training or experience in a hospital approved
by the Council on Medical Education and Hospitals of
the American Medical Association for internship or
2025-2305 HB1379 SDl SMA.docx

Page 2 H.B. NO. g’?
residency [may be licensed by the Hawaii medical board
undc-r—&ecfe-i-on—4-&5—4 (c) . ] ; or
(2) Passed the Federation Licensing Examination (FLEX) or
the United States Medical Licensing Examination
(USMLE), or a combination of these examinations as
approved by the board, with scores deemed satisfactory
to the board, possesses an Educational Commission for
Foreign Medical Graduates certificate, and has
successfully completed two years of post-graduate
medical training in a program approved by the
Accreditation Council for Graduate Medical Education
or Zhnerican Osteopathic Association or a Canadian
program that has been accredited for resident training
by the Royal College of Physicians and Surgeons of
Canada or College of Family Physicians of Canada;
provided that if- the post-graduate medical training
involves a subspecialty clinical fellowship program,
the board may accept post-graduate medical training in
a hospital that has an Accreditation Council for
Graduate Medical Education or 7\merican Osteopathic
2025-2305 HB1379 SDl SMA.docx 2

Page 3
H.B. NO.
Association or accredited Canadian post graduate
medical training program in the parent specialty."
SECTION 2. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 3. This Act shall take effect upon its approval.
2025-2305 HB1379 SDl SMA.docx 3

H.B. NO. S'?
APPROVED this 4th day of June , 2025
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

HB No. 1379, HD 2, SD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date; April 21, 2025
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of2025.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives

H.B.No. 1379, H.D. 2, S.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HA WAHI
Date: April 8, 2025
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Third Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session of 2025.
Clerk of the Senate
1725